Utah statutes.
9-7-305.   Injury to and failure to return books -- Action.

(1)  If any person injures any book owned by the state law library or fails to return any book taken from the State Law Library, that person shall pay the state law librarian all loss or damage sustained because of the injury or failure to return, including costs and reasonable attorneys' fees.

(2)  The state law librarian, in behalf of the state, shall bring action in the name of the state for the collection of all damages sustained and all losses and penalties imposed under this section.

